Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Oregon State University Extension Service shall  oversee a project to
accelerate the promotion of behavioral health in Oregon by:
(1) Convening local  committees from across the behavioral health sector to develop a
plan to promote behavioral health;
(2) Facilitating community conversations about mental health and substance use; and
(3) Contributing to any follow-up actions taken by counties or  regions that choose to
participate in the project.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 920 (SB 920-INTRO) Page 1